Wisconsin, session 2025, SB774.
do enact as follows:SB774,13Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 4insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB774,23Section 2. 20.370 (1) (js) of the statutes is created to read:SB774,2,6420.370 (1) (js) Wolf monitoring and abatement. As a continuing 5appropriation, the amounts in the schedule for wolf monitoring and projects for 6nonlethal abatement of wolves.SB774,2,77